New Jersey, session 221, A2327.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a.  The Department of Environmental Protection shall conduct an assessment every five years of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances that are unregulated pursuant to State or federal law, or any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, at the time of the assessment, in order to determine whether a maximum contaminant level or other drinking water standard should be established for one or more such PFASs. b.    The Department of Environmental Protection shall conduct an assessment of whether current and proposed maximum contaminant levels for PFASs adequately protect the health of children, given their lower average body weight, and higher ratio of drinking water intake by weight, as compared to a maximum contaminant level based on the average adult body weight. c.     The depart may consult or collaborate with the Drinking Water Quality Institute established pursuant to section 10 of P.L.1983, c.443 (C.58:12A-20) in order to implement the provisions of this section. d.  The department shall submit a written report containing the findings of each assessment conducted pursuant to this section to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature.  The department shall also publish each report on its Internet website. e.  As used in this section, "perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substance" or "PFAS" means any member of the class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.